Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-607
Railroad property; Tax Commissioner; hearing; power to compel attendance of railroad's officers or agents.

The Tax Commissioner shall have power to require any officer, agent, or servant of any railroad or railway company having any portion of its property in this state to attend a hearing and to answer under oath questions regarding the property. The Tax Commissioner shall have power to issue whatever notice or process may be necessary to compel the attendance of any such person as a witness.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 91, p. 417;

R.S.1913, § 6381;

Laws 1921, c. 133, art. VI, § 7, p. 558;

C.S.1922, § 5845;

C.S.1929, § 77-507;

R.S.1943, § 77-607;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 213;

Laws 1985, LB 268, § 9;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 66;

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 29;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 34.